Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Judicial Retirement System for Judges and Commissioners
21.510.
Appropriation — Transfer of funds to judicial retirement fund.

For the purposes of KRS

21.350

to

21.510

, there is appropriated to the judicial retirement fund all sums received from contributions of members of the retirement system created by KRS

21.350

to

21.510

. There further is appropriated, out of the general expenditure fund in the State Treasury, the sum of $53,600 for the fiscal year 1960-61 and the sum of $73,600 for the fiscal year 1961-62. The amount of accumulated state employer contributions to the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, on account of judges and commissioners of the Court of Appeals having been members of that system, also is hereby transferred to the judicial retirement fund. All sums appropriated or transferred to the judicial retirement fund shall be deemed to constitute a continuing fund which shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 18; 1984, ch. 111, § 29, effective July 13, 1984.

21.520.
Disposition and use of assets of former special circuit judge fund — Segregation of funds. [Repealed.]

21.525.
Contributions by state — Normal cost and actuarially accrued liability contributions — Employer costs for hybrid cash balance plan.

The state, by appropriation to the Judicial Retirement Board, shall contribute annually to the Judicial Retirement System an amount equal to the percent as computed under subsection (2)(a) of this section of the creditable compensation of active members of the Judicial Retirement System, to be known as the “normal cost contribution,” and an additional amount computed under subsection (2)(b) of this section, to be known as the “actuarially accrued liability contribution.”

The normal cost contribution shall be determined using:

The entry age normal cost funding method;

An asset smoothing method that smooths investment gains and losses over a five (5) year period; and

Other funding methods and assumptions established by the board.

The actuarially accrued liability contribution shall be computed as follows:

The total unfunded actuarially accrued liability shall be amortized over a closed period of twenty (20) years beginning with the 2023 actuarial valuation;

Any increase or decrease in the unfunded actuarially accrued liability occurring after the completion of the 2023 actuarial valuation shall be amortized over a closed period of twenty (20) years beginning with the actuarial valuation in which the increase or decrease in the unfunded actuarially accrued liability is recognized. An increase or decrease in the unfunded actuarially accrued liability may result from, but not be limited to, legislative changes to benefits, changes in actuarial methods or assumptions, or actuarial gains or losses;

If the annual valuation determines that the plan has surplus actuarial assets, the prior amortization bases established under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph shall be eliminated, and one (1) base equal to the amount of surplus actuarial assets shall be established and amortized over an open period of twenty (20) years; and

The actuarially accrued liability contribution shall be determined by actuarial methods consistent with the methods prescribed for determining the normal cost contribution, except that beginning with the 2023 actuarial valuation the level dollar amortization method shall be utilized.

The board shall adopt the actuarial assumptions that are to be used in making the determinations.

The normal cost contribution and the actuarially accrued liability contribution for each fiscal biennium shall be determined on the basis of the actuarial valuation last preceding the commencement of the biennium.

Employer costs for the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS

21.402

shall be incorporated into the employer contribution rate of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan and the Judicial Retirement Plan as a new benefit tier within the plans.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 246, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 299, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 2013, ch. 120, § 32, effective July 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Pt. I, A, 2, (1) at 981.

21.530.
Coordination of Legislators’ Retirement and Judicial Retirement Plans — Board.

For administrative purposes only, as hereinafter provided, the Legislators’ Retirement Plan and the Judicial Retirement Plan shall be coordinated under the name, Judicial Form Retirement System, but each of the plans shall maintain its separate identity. A board of trustees of that system hereby is created, to consist of eight (8) members, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the Supreme Court, two (2) by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation in accordance with KRS

11.160

for each appointment or reappointment, one (1) by the President of the Senate, one (1) by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and one (1) by the president and speaker jointly. The appointments by the Governor shall:

Not be from among the members of either of the plans in the system, or from among the persons drawing benefits from either of those plans; and

Have investment experience. For purposes of this paragraph, a trustee with “investment experience” means an individual who does not have a conflict of interest, as provided by KRS

21.540

, and who has at least ten (10) years of experience in one (1) of the following areas of expertise:

A portfolio manager acting in a fiduciary capacity;

A professional securities analyst or investment consultant;

A current or retired employee or principal of a trust institution, investment or finance organization, or endowment fund acting in an investment-related capacity;

A chartered financial analyst in good standing as determined by the CFA Institute; or

A university professor, teaching investment-related studies.

The members of the board shall serve for terms of four (4) years, commencing as of July 1, 1980, and until their successors are chosen and have qualified; provided that if a member of the board who was a member of one (1) of the plans in the system when he was appointed ceases to be a member of that plan, a vacancy shall thereupon be deemed to exist in his position on the board; and provided further, that the members of the Judicial Retirement Board in office on July 1, 1980, shall serve for the remainder of the terms for which they were appointed, as the members of the board created by this section, in the positions appointable by the Supreme Court and the Governor. Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority for the unexpired term.

A trustee shall not serve more than three (3) consecutive four (4) year terms. A trustee who has served three (3) consecutive terms may be appointed again after an absence of four (4) years from the board. The term limits established by this paragraph shall apply to trustees serving on or after July 1, 2012, and all terms of office served prior to July 1, 2012, shall be used to determine if the trustee has exceeded the term limits provided by this paragraph.

The members of the board shall annually elect a chairman. The chairman shall not serve more than four (4) consecutive years as chairman of the board. A trustee who has served four (4) consecutive years as chairman of the board may be elected chairman of the board after an absence of two (2) years from the position.

Gubernatorial appointees, and judicial and legislative appointees who do not receive an annual salary from the State Treasury in another capacity shall receive an amount equal to the per diem compensation paid to members of the General Assembly for each day they are in session. All members shall be reimbursed for their necessary expenses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 19, effective July 1, 1980; 1994, ch. 486, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 448, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 128, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2012, ch. 75, § 6, effective April 11, 2012; 2017 ch. 12, § 1, effective March 10, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/10/2017).
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 14 provided that amendments made to subsection (1) of this statute in
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 1 that require Senate confirmation of, and modify the requirements for, gubernatorial appointments to the Judicial Form Retirement System and the Kentucky Retirement Systems boards of trustees shall apply to appointments or reappointments made on or after March 10, 2017, the effective date of that Acts chapter.

21.540.
Duties of board of trustees — Qualified domestic relations orders — Intent to conform with federal law — Availability of information on Web site — Conflicts of interest — Prohibition against fees for unregulated placement agents — Investment procurement policy — Release of certain information from accounts of current or former legislators.

Except as provided in KRS

21.550

,

21.560

, and subsections (3) and (7) of this section, the board of trustees of the Judicial Form Retirement System shall be charged with the administration of KRS

6.500

to

6.577

and

21.350

to

21.510

.

The Judicial Form Retirement System shall have all powers necessary to administer KRS

6.500

to

6.577

and

21.350

to

21.510

including the power to promulgate all reasonable administrative regulations, pass upon questions of eligibility and disability, make employments for services, to contract for fiduciary liability insurance, investment counseling, and actuarial, auditing, and other professional services subject to the limitations of KRS Chapters 45, 45A, 56, and 57.

The administrative expenses shall be paid out of an administrative account which shall be funded by transfers of the necessary money, in appropriate ratio, from the funds provided for in KRS

21.550

and

21.560

.

Authorization for all administrative expenses relating to the operations of the Judicial Form Retirement System shall be contained in the biennial budget unit request, branch budget recommendations, and the financial plan adopted by the General Assembly pursuant to KRS Chapter 48.

The request from the Judicial Form Retirement System shall include any specific administrative expenses requested by the board of trustees that are not otherwise specified by this subsection.

A qualified domestic relations order issued by a court or administrative agency shall be honored by the Judicial Form Retirement System if the order is in compliance with the requirements established by the retirement system.

Except in cases involving child support payments, the Judicial Form Retirement System may charge reasonable and necessary fees and expenses to the participant and the alternate payee of a qualified domestic relations order for the administration of the qualified domestic relations order by the retirement system. All fees and expenses shall be established by administrative regulations promulgated by the board of trustees of the retirement system. The qualified domestic relations order shall specify whether the fees and expenses provided by this subsection shall be paid:

Solely by the participant;

Solely by the alternate payee; or

Equally shared by the participant and alternate payee.

For purposes of this subsection, a “qualified domestic relations order” shall mean any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:

Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and

Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital property rights to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a member.

Notwithstanding any other evidence of legislative intent, it is hereby declared to be the controlling legislative intent that the provisions of KRS

21.345

to

21.580

and

6.500

to

6.577

shall conform with federal statutes or regulations and meet the qualification requirements under 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(a)

, applicable federal regulations, and other published guidance, and the board shall have the authority to promulgate administrative regulations, with retroactive effect if required under federal law, to conform the Legislators’ Retirement Plan and the Judicial Retirement Plan with federal statutes and regulations and to meet the qualification requirements under 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(a)

.

In order to improve public transparency regarding the administration of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan and the Judicial Retirement Plan, the board of trustees of the Judicial Form Retirement System shall adopt a best-practices model by posting the following information to the system’s Web site and shall make it available to the public:

Meeting notices and agendas for all meetings of the board. Notices and agendas shall be posted to the system’s Web site at least seventy-two (72) hours in advance of the board or committee meetings, except in the case of special or emergency meetings as provided by KRS

61.823

;

A list of the members of the board of trustees and membership on each committee established by the board, including any investment committees;

A list of system staff and each staff’s salary;

A list of the fund’s professional consultants and their respective fees and commissions paid by the system;

A list of the system’s expenditures;

The annual financial audit of the system, which shall include but not be limited to a statement of plan net assets, a statement of changes in plan net assets, an actuarial value of assets, a schedule of investments, a statement of funded status and funding progress, and other supporting data;

All external audits;

The annual actuarial valuation report of pension and retiree health benefits of each retirement plan administered by the system, which shall include a general statistical section and information on contributions, benefit payouts, and retirement plan demographic data;

All board minutes or other materials that require adoption or ratification by the board of trustees or committees of the board. The items listed in this paragraph shall be posted within seventy-two (72) hours of adoption or ratification by the board or committees;

All bylaws, policies, or procedures adopted or ratified by the board of trustees or by committees of the board;

The summary plan description for each plan administered by the system;

A document or a link to documents containing an unofficial copy of the statutes governing the plans administered by the Judicial Form Retirement System;

Investment information, including all investment holdings in aggregate, fees, and commissions for each fund administered by the board, which shall be updated on a quarterly basis for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2017. The system shall request from all managers, partnerships, and any other available sources all information regarding fees and commissions and shall, based on the requested information received:

Disclose the dollar value of fees and commissions paid to each individual manager or partnership;

Disclose the dollar value of any profit sharing, carried interest, or any other partnership incentive arrangements, partnership agreements, or any other partnership expenses received by or paid to each manager or partnership; and

As applicable, report each fee or commission by manager or partnership consistent with standards established by the Institutional Limited Partners Association (ILPA).

In addition to the requirements of this paragraph, the system shall also disclose the name and address of all individual underlying managers or partners in any fund of funds in which system assets are invested;

An update of net investment returns, asset allocations, and the performance of the funds against benchmarks adopted by the board for each fund, for each asset class administered by the board, and for each manager over a historical period. The update shall be posted on a quarterly basis for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2017;

All contracts or offering documents for services, goods, or property purchased or utilized by the system. Notwithstanding KRS

61.878

, all contracts, including investment contracts, shall be subject to review by the board, the Auditor of Public Accounts, and the Government Contract Review Committee established pursuant to KRS

45A.705

. If any public record contains material which is not excepted under KRS

61.878

, the system shall separate the excepted material by removal, segregation, or redaction, and make the nonexcepted material available for examination; and

Information regarding the system’s financial and actuarial condition that is easily understood by the members, retired members, and the public.

Nothing in this subsection shall require or compel the Judicial Form Retirement System to disclose information specific to the account of an individual member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan.

No trustee or employee of the board shall:

Have any interest, direct or indirect, in the gains or profits of any investment or transaction made by the board, provided that the provisions of this paragraph shall not prohibit a member or retiree of one (1) of the retirement plans administered by the system from serving as a trustee;

Directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an agent, use the assets of the system, except to make current and necessary payments authorized by the board;

Become an endorser, surety, or obligor for moneys loaned by or borrowed from the board;

Have a contract or agreement with the retirement system, individually or through a business owned by the trustee or the employee;

Use his or her official position with the retirement system to obtain a financial gain or benefit or advantage for himself or herself or a family member;

Use confidential information acquired during his or her tenure with the systems to further his or her own economic interests or that of another person; or

Hold outside employment with, or accept compensation from, any person or business with which he or she has involvement as part of his or her official position with the system. The provisions of this paragraph shall not prohibit:

A trustee from serving as a judge or member of the General Assembly; or

A trustee from serving on the board if the compensation is de minimus and incidental to the trustee’s outside employment. If the compensation is more than de minimus, the trustee shall disclose the amount of the compensation to the other trustees and recuse himself or herself from any matters involving hiring or retaining a person or a business from whom more than de minimus amounts are received by the trustee. For purposes of this section, “de minimus” means an insignificant amount that does not raise a reasonable question as to the trustee’s objectivity.

Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS

6.500

to

6.577

and

21.345

to

21.580

to the contrary, no funds of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan, including fees and commissions paid to an investment manager, private fund, or company issuing securities, who manages systems assets, shall be used to pay fees and commissions to placement agents. For purposes of this subsection, “placement agent” means a third-party individual, who is not an employee, or firm, wholly or partially owned by the entity being hired, who solicits investments on behalf of an investment manager, private fund, or company issuing securities.

All contracts for the investment or management of assets of the system shall not be subject to KRS Chapters 45, 45A, 56, and 57. Instead, the board shall conduct the following process to develop and adopt an investment procurement policy with which all prospective contracts for the investment or management of assets of the system shall comply:

On or before July 1, 2017, the board shall consult with the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee to develop an investment procurement policy, which shall be written to meet best practices in investment management procurement;

Thirty (30) days prior to adoption, the board shall tender the preliminary investment procurement policy to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee for review and comment;

Upon receipt of comments from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee, the board shall choose to adopt or not adopt any recommended changes;

Upon adoption, the board shall tender the final investment procurement policy to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee;

No later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the investment procurement policy, the secretary or his or her designee shall certify whether the board’s investment procurement policy meets or does not meet best practices for investment management procurement; and

Any amendments to the investment procurement policy shall adhere to the requirements set forth by paragraphs (b) to (e) of this subsection.

Upon request by any person, the Judicial Form Retirement System shall release the following information from the accounts of any member or retiree of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan, if the member or retiree is a current or former officeholder in the Kentucky General Assembly:
(8) (a) 1. Upon request by any person, the Judicial Form Retirement System shall release the following information from the accounts of any member or retiree of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan, if the member or retiree is a current or former officeholder in the Kentucky General Assembly:

The first and last name of the member or retiree;

The plan or plans in which the member has an account or from which the retiree is receiving a monthly retirement allowance;

The status of the member or retiree, including but not limited to whether he or she is a contributing to the plans but has not retired, or a retiree drawing a monthly retirement allowance;

If the individual is a retiree, the monthly retirement allowance that he or she was receiving at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year; and

If the individual is a member who has not yet retired, the estimated monthly retirement allowance that he or she is eligible to receive on the first date he or she would be eligible for an unreduced retirement allowance, using his or her service credit, final compensation, and accumulated account balance at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year.

No information shall be disclosed under this paragraph from an account that is paying benefits to a beneficiary due to the death of a member or retiree.

The release of information under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not constitute a violation of the Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 20, effective July 1, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 30, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 263, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 266, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 148, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 75, § 7, effective April 11, 2012; 2013, ch. 43, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 4, § 3, effective March 10, 2017; 2017 ch. 12, § 2, effective March 10, 2017; 2022 ch. 55, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/10/2017). 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 12 provided that amendments made to subsections (1) and (6) of this statute in 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 2 governing placement agents and contracts or offerings entered into by the state-administered retirement systems shall apply to contracts and offerings established or contracts or offerings renewed on or after July 1, 2017.

(3/10/2017). 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 13 provided that amendments made to subsections (1) and (7) of this statute in 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 2 governing the application of the Model Procurement Code, KRS Chapter 45A, and related statutes to the state-administered retirement systems, shall apply to contracts and offerings established or contracts or offerings renewed on or after July 1, 2017.

(4/11/2012). 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 75, sec. 18, provides that the amendments made to subsection (6) of this statute regarding unregulated placement agents by 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 75, sec. 7, “shall apply to contracts established or contracts renewed on or after July 1, 2012.”

21.550.
Investments, judicial retirement fund.

Those members of the board of trustees of the Judicial Form Retirement System who are appointed by the Supreme Court, together with the members appointed by the Governor, shall constitute an investment committee for the Judicial Retirement Plan, and as such shall have full and sole authority over the judicial retirement fund and the investment thereof, including the prescribing of funding standards, the adoption of actuarial methods and assumptions, and the making of employments or contracts for required personal services, including administrative, actuarial and investment counseling services. The committee shall be considered trustee of the judicial retirement fund and shall have the sole authority to make investment transactions or obtain insurance contracts for funding purposes. The fund shall be invested in securities which, at the time of making the investment, are by law permitted for the investment of funds by fiduciaries in this state, or funding may be accomplished in part by contract with a reputable life insurance company authorized to do business in this state. To the extent that funding is provided through insurance contract, no contributions, payments or premiums shall be subject to any tax on insurance premiums or annuity considerations.

The investment committee for the judicial retirement fund shall appoint one (1) or more custodians of the securities acquired under authority of this section, each of whom shall be responsible for the safekeeping of the securities in his custody. All registered securities shall be registered in the name “Kentucky Judicial Retirement Fund” (securities heretofore registered in the name “Kentucky Judicial Retirement System” may continue in that name), or in nominee name as provided comparably in KRS

286.3-225

, and every change in registration, by reason of sale or assignment of such securities, shall be accomplished by the signatures of the chairman of the investment committee or a member of that committee appointed by the chairman, and by the secretary-treasurer of the fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 21, effective July 1, 1980.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 247 instructs the Reviser of Statutes to adjust KRS references throughout the statutes to conform with the 2006 renumbering of the Financial Services Code, KRS Chapter 286. Such an adjustment has been made in this statute.

Research References and Practice Aids

2010-2012 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget, 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 154, Pt. I, 2, (1) at 2117.

See Legislative Branch Budget, 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 156, Pt. I, 1, (1) at 2123.

21.560.
Investments — Legislative retirement fund.

The members of the board of trustees of the Judicial Form Retirement System who are appointed by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, singly or jointly, together with the members of the board who are appointed by the Governor, shall constitute an investment committee for the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, and as such shall have all the powers and duties with respect to the legislators’ retirement fund as are given by KRS 21.440(1) and

21.550

to the investment committee of the Judicial Retirement Plan with respect to the judicial retirement fund. The committee provided for by this section may, with the concurrence of the investment committee for the Judicial Retirement Plan, arrange for the legislators’ retirement fund and the judicial retirement fund to constitute a common fund for investment purposes only, to be under the management of the investment committee for the Judicial Retirement Plan, each fund sharing in the common fund in proportion to the value of its assets contributed to the common fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 22, effective July 1, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 31, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 486, § 17, effective July 15, 1994.

21.565.
Administration and assets of plan created under KRS 21.567.

The Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan excess benefit plan established in KRS

21.567

shall be administered by the board of trustees of the Kentucky Judicial Form Retirement System. The board shall have the same authority in its administration as it has in the administration of the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan.

The plan shall constitute a qualified governmental excess benefit plan as provided in 26

U.S.C. sec. 415(m)

.

All retired members and beneficiaries of the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan whose effective retirement dates are July 1, 1998, or after, and whose retirement allowances have been limited by 26

U.S.C. sec. 415

shall be participants in the plan. Each member’s participation in the plan shall be determined each fiscal year and shall cease for any year in which the retirement allowance is not limited by 26

U.S.C. sec. 415

.

A participant shall receive a benefit equal to the difference between the retirement allowance otherwise payable from the plan prior to any reduction or limitation required by 26

U.S.C. sec. 415

and the actual retirement allowance payable as limited by 26

U.S.C. sec. 415

. The benefit shall be subject to withholding for applicable state and federal taxes. The benefit shall be paid in accordance with the retirement payment option selected by the member for the retirement allowance.

The board, in accordance with the recommendation of the actuary, shall determine the required contribution to pay benefits each fiscal year. The required contribution for each fiscal year shall be the total amount of benefits payable under this section to all participants plus the amount required to pay any employment taxes on the benefits paid from the plan.

The required contribution shall be paid from state appropriations.

The required contribution shall be deposited into the separate fund. The plan is intended to be exempt from federal income tax under 26

U.S.C. sec. 115

and 26

U.S.C. sec. 415(m)(1)

.

The benefit liability shall be determined on a fiscal year basis, and contributions shall not be accumulated to pay benefits in future fiscal years. Any assets not used to pay benefits in the current fiscal year shall be paid to the Retirement Plan.

The benefits payable from the plan shall be treated in accordance with KRS

21.470

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 90, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

21.567.
Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan excess benefit plan — Excess benefit fund.

There is created and established:

An excess benefit plan to be known as the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan excess benefit plan. The plan is created for the purpose of providing retirement allowances payable from the retirement plan under KRS

21.345

to

21.580

that would otherwise be limited by 26

U.S.C. sec. 415

; and

A state fund to be known as the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan excess benefit fund which shall consist of all the assets of the plan.

The administration and assets of the plan created under this section shall be as set forth in KRS

21.565

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 90, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

21.570.
Nonseverability of provisions.

If any provision of Acts 1980, ch. 407, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the entire chapter shall be invalid, and to this end the provisions of Acts 1980, ch. 407 are not severable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 28, effective July 1, 1980.

21.580.
Senior Status Program for Special Judges. [Repealed effective July 1, 2007; See 5/23/2007 LRC Note.]

As a pilot project to determine the effectiveness of using senior retired judges to combat backlog and delay in Kentucky courts, there is hereby created a “Senior Status Program for Special Judges.” The program shall be implemented as follows:

KRS

21.400

(1) and any other provision in KRS Chapter 21 to the contrary notwithstanding, a member who retires at a time when combining his total years of judicial service credit and his age equals or exceeds the number seventy-five (75), may elect, within ninety (90) days following retirement, to participate in the “Senior Status Program for Special Judges,” if he complies with the provisions of this subsection. In that event, the member shall be entitled to a service retirement allowance, commencing at the member’s normal retirement age, payable monthly during his lifetime in an amount equal to five percent (5%) of his final compensation multiplied by the number of years of his judicial service, not to exceed twenty (20) years of judicial service at the five percent (5%) factor, not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final compensation. “Final compensation”, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, for all members retiring under any provision of KRS

21.345

to

21.570

or this section, or similar statutes governing the same positions, as defined in KRS

21.400

shall be based on a period of thirty-six (36) months. Any nonjudicial time shall be counted as is otherwise provided in KRS Chapter 21, but in no event shall service retirement allowance exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final compensation.

In the event the retiring judge elects to retire as a “Senior Status Special Judge” under this subsection, he shall commit to serve, upon appointment by the Chief Justice of the Commonwealth, as special judge for one hundred twenty (120) work days per year for a term of five (5) years without compensation other than the retirement benefits under this subsection. The Senior Status Special Judge may agree to work more than one hundred twenty (120) days in any year within the five (5) years of service; however, the Senior Status Special Judge shall be compensated as otherwise provided by law, in addition to his retirement benefits, for any days served in excess of one hundred twenty (120) in that year. If the Senior Status Special Judge has not served a total of six hundred (600) days within the five (5) year period outlined in this subsection, the Chief Justice shall require the Senior Status Special Judge to serve at no additional compensation to the Senior Status Special Judge, until the six hundred (600) day period is served by the Senior Status Special Judge. The Senior Status Special Judge and the Chief Justice may agree in writing to serve less than the one hundred twenty (120) days in any one (1) or more of the five (5) years; however, any of the days not served in a given year shall be served at the end of the five (5) year period set forth in this subsection.

Should any member electing to retire under the Senior Status Program for Special Judges fail, when ordered by the Chief Justice to serve the requisite number of days not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days a year for the five (5) year period outlined in this subsection, unless otherwise agreed in writing, he shall no longer be eligible for benefits computed under this subsection and shall return to the benefits otherwise provided under this chapter.

Subject to Section 110(5)(b) of the Kentucky Constitution, the Chief Justice shall give due regard, when practical, to the desirability of appointing Senior Status Special Judges to serve within their judicial region as defined by the regional administration charter.

The inviolable contract provisions of Kentucky law, KRS

21.480

, shall apply during the period of time that KRS

21.580

is effective; however, no other provisions of 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 305 shall be considered subject to an inviolable contract of the Commonwealth.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to invalidate provisions in the current law which require a penalty for retiring before the normal retirement age.

The Senior Status Program for Special Judges created by this section shall be open to any member who is a judge in office on June 24, 2003, and who subsequently retires as a Senior Status Special Judge on or before January 31, 2009.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 305, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 305, § 4, repealed effective July 1, 2007; 2002, ch. 258, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 128, § 6, effective June 24, 2003.